Hawaii statutes.
[§801D-3] Eligibility of victims.
A victim has the rights afforded by this chapter and is eligible for the
services under this chapter only if the victim reported the crime to police
within three months of its occurrence or discovery, unless the victim had
justification to do otherwise. [L 1988, c 261, pt of §1; gen ch 1992]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next